Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2116
Shares; exempt from registration.

The shares of capital stock of the corporation and the documents representing the indebtedness of the corporation to its members, and any offering of the above, shall be exempt from registration under the Securities Act of Nebraska. A corporation making any such offering, and the officers and employees thereof, shall also be exempt from registration and qualification as dealers and salesmen under the Securities Act of Nebraska.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 16, p. 308.

Securities Act of Nebraska, see section 8-1123.